North Carolina, session 2025, HB703.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 8A of Chapter 65 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 65-43.7. Sale of monuments and memorials.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, State veterans cemeteries shall make
available for purchase monuments and memorials honoring those interred therein for placement
within the cemetery.
(b) As used in this section, the term "monuments and memorials" shall include, but not
be limited to, memorial trees, granite or marble markers, and granite or marble benches. The term
shall not include headstones.
(c) The State veterans cemeteries may require that the monuments and memorials offered
for sale under this section meet all stylistic guidelines or requirements of the cemetery but may
not completely or effectively prohibit the sale of monuments and memorials under this section.
(d) The State veterans cemeteries shall not charge more than the market rate for
monuments and memorials sold under this section.
(e) The proceeds from the sale of monuments and memorials under this section shall be
retained by the State veterans cemetery that sells them and be used solely for the purpose of
maintaining, improving, or caring for that cemetery."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
*H703-v-1*